Hawaii, session 2025, SB890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 486, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part V to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§486-     Poi; labeling requirements.  (a) If a product labeled, marketed, or sold as "poi" contains any kalo grown outside the State, the product shall reveal a label stating:  "This product contains kalo grown outside Hawaii."; provided that the label shall further identify the origin of the kalo used in the product. (b)  If this section or any provision of this section conflicts at any time with federal law, then the federal law shall prevail and this section or the relevant provisions of this section shall become ineffective and invalid.  The ineffectiveness or invalidity of this section or any of its provisions shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter which shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this section are severable. (c)  For purposes of this section, "kalo" means the cultivated plant known as taro (Colocasia esculenta), or one of the four genera in the family Araceae, Aroid, or Philodendron, which includes Colocasia, Xanthosoma, Alocasia, and Cyrtosperma." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.